src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun inflection for Mansi
! ----------------

!! This file contains the noun inflection. 


! This documentation is obsolete (see below):

! Stems ending in V
! 1. N01 = stem ending in (а|о|у|э|а̄|о̄|ӯ|э̄|я|ё|ю|е|я̄|ё̄|ю̄|е̄)
! 1. N02 = stem ending in (и|ы|ӣ|ы̄)

! Stems ending in C
! 1. N13 = stem ending in (г|ӈ|в|к|кв|м|п|р|х)
! 1. N14 = stem ending in (ль|нь|ть)
! 1. N16 = stem ending in (й)
! 1. N17 = stem ending in (б|д|ф|ц|ч|ш|з|ж)
! 1. N18 = stem ending in (бь|дь|фь|ць|чь|шь|зь|жь|рь)
! 1. N19 = stem ending in (щ)

! Stems ending in CC
! 1. N23 = stem ending in C and (г|ӈ|в|к|кв|м|п|р|х)
! 1. N24 = stem ending in C and (л|н|т|с)
! 1. N25 = stem ending in C and (ль|нь|ть)
! 1. N26 = stem ending in C and (й)
! 1. N27 = stem ending in C and (б|д|ф|ц|ч|ш|з|ж)
! 1. N28 = stem ending in C and (бь|дь|фь|ць|чь|шь|зь|жь|рь)
! 1. N29 = stem ending in C and (щ)

! Stems ending in CCC
! 1. N33 = stem ending in CC and (г|ӈ|в|к|кв|м|п|р|х)
! 1. N34 = stem ending in CC and (л|н|т|с)
! 1. N35 = stem ending in CC and (ль|нь|ть)
! 1. N36 = stem ending in CC and (й)
! 1. N37 = stem ending in CC and (б|д|ф|ц|ч|ш|з|ж)
! 1. N38 = stem ending in CC and (бь|дь|фь|ць|чь|шь|зь|жь|рь)
! 1. N29 = stem ending in CC and (щ)

! Stems with syncopating vowel
! 1. N4311 = syncopating stems ending in -ыг
! 1. N4321 = syncopating stems ending in -иг
! 1. N4331 = syncopating stems ending in -ыӈ
! 1. N4341 = syncopating stems ending in -иӈ
! 1. N4411 = syncopating stems ending in -ыл
! 1. N4421 = syncopating stems ending in -ил
! 1. N4431 = syncopating stems ending in -ын
! 1. N4441 = syncopating stems ending in -ин
! 1. N4511 = syncopating stems ending in -ум
! 1. N4521 = syncopating stems ending in -ым
! 1. N4531 = syncopating stems ending in -уп
! 1. N4611 = syncopating stems ending in -ыр
! 1. N4621 = syncopating stems ending in -ир
! 1. N4711 = syncopating stems ending in -ых
! 1. N4721 = syncopating stems ending in -их

! 1. N53 = irregular paradigm of хум

!! All Mansi nouns have the same suffixe, thus only one continuation lexica.
!! The stem vowel alternation is taken care of in the twolc file.

!! ## The lexicon
LEXICON N_VI_rus100
!+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_VI ; !  xxx testing without SpellNoSugg (концертн ≥ концертын)
N_VI ;
LEXICON N_VI !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems ending in и ы: а̄ви
!! put derivations here
 N0_VI ;
LEXICON N0_VI !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems ending in и ы: а̄ви
:%{VI%} N1_SG ;
:%{VI%} N1_DU ;
:%{VI%} N1_PL ;
:%{VI%} SG_NOM_PXSG3_te ;
:%{VI%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_te ;
:%{VI%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_tee ;
:%{VI%} N1_SG_X_PXDU_LONG ;
:%{VI%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumeen ;
:%{VI%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC_PXDU1_ujumen ;
:%{VI%}	SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{VI%}	SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
:%{VI%} SG_X_PXDU3_teen ;
:%{VI%} SG_X_PXDU3_ten ;
:%{VI%} SG_X_PXPL2_yyn ;

:%{VI%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{VI%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
:%{VI%}	DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
:%{VI%}	DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;
:%{VI%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmeen ;
:%{VI%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagamen ;
:%{VI%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{VI%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;

:%{VI%}  DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;


:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanmeen ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanmen ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;

:%{VI%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{VI%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumeen ; ! ? +N+Sg+Nom %{уØ%} м е̄ н 2023_04_29 са̄лыме̄н
:%{VI%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumen ; !  2023_04_29 са̄лымен
!@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@P.PossPx.Du1@

LEXICON N_VO_rus100 !!≈ * @CODE@
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_VO ;
LEXICON N_VO_rusmns !!≈ * @CODE@ slightly Mansi-like
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_VO ;
LEXICON N_VO
!! put derivations here
 N0_VO ;
LEXICON N0_VO !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems ending in other vowels ӯра
! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: ма̄ #
!!€ ма̄тем:       ма̄+N+Der+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom+PxSg1

!!:%{VO%} N1_ ;
:%{VO%} N1_SG ;
:%{VO%} N1_DU ;
:%{VO%} N1_PL ;
:%{VO%}%>ытыт PL_LOC_K ; ! я̄тыт
:%{VO%}%>ытын PL_LAT_K ; ! хо̄тпатын
:%{VO%} N1_SG_X_PXDU_SHORT ;
:%{VO%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC_PXDU1_ujumeen ;
:%{VO%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{VO%} SG_X_PXDU3_teen ;
:%{VO%} SG_X_PXPL2_yyn ;

:%{VO%} N1_DU_X_PXDU_SHORT ;
+Du+Nom+PxPl2:%{VO%}%>%{аяØ%}гы̄н K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:%{VO%}%>%{аяØ%}ны̄н K ;
:%{VO%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{VO%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmen ;
:%{VO%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanameen ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanamen ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{VO%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumeen ; ! ? +N+Sg+Nom %{уØ%} м е̄ н 2023_04_29 са̄лыме̄н
:%{VO%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumen ; !  2023_04_29 са̄лымен

LEXICON N_SYNCH
!! put derivations here
 N0_SYNCH ;
LEXICON N0_SYNCH !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems with syncopy, hard
:%{SYNCH%}%>ныл SG_ABL_K ;
:%{SYNCH%}%>ыл SG_INS_K ; !
:%{SYNCH%}%>н SG_LAT_K ; !
:%{SYNCH%}%>ын SG_LAT_K ; !
:%{SYNCH%}%>т SG_LOC_K ; !
:%{SYNCH%}%>ыт SG_LOC_K ; !
:%{SYNCH%} SG_NOM_K ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_TRA_K ;!
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXSG1_ujum ;
:%{SYNCH%}  SG_X_PXSG2_yn ;
:%{SYNCH%}  SG_X_PXSG3_te ;
:%{SYNCH%}  SG_X_PXSG3_tee ;
:%{SYNCH%}  SG_X_PXPL1_ujuv ;
:%{SYNCH%}  SG_X_PXPL3_ajanyl ;
  

:%{SYNCH%} N1_DU ;
:%{SYNCH%} N1_PL ;

:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_een ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXPL2_yyn ;! Is the nominative differerent from the oblique cases

:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;


:%{SYNCH%}%>ытыт PL_LOC_K ;! потрытыт 2023_03_11
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;

:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU1_ajameen ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU1_ajamen ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_en ;


:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmen ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;

:%{SYNCH%}%>ытын PL_LAT_K ;! 
:%{SYNCH%}%>ытыт PL_LOC_K ;! потрытыт 2023_03_11
!:%{SYNCH%}%>ытл PL_INS_K ; ! потрытл 2023_03_11
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanameen ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanamen ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;


:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_een ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_en ;

:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXPL2_yn ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:%{SYNCH%}%>ы̄н K ;

:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXSG1_ajagum ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXSG2_ajagyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_NOM_PXSG2_ajagn ;!check
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagamen ;

:%{SYNCH%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
:%{SYNCH%}	DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{SYNCH%}	DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXPL1_ajaguv ;

:%{SYNCH%}  DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%}  DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;

:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXSG1_ajanum ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXSG2_ajanyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXSG2_ajan ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL1_ynuv ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;

LEXICON N_SYNCS
!! put derivations here
 N0_SYNCS ;
