src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
агитация+N:агитация N_VO_rus100 "агитация" ;
академия+N:академия N_VO_rus100 ;
алпи+N:алпи N_VI "тело" ;
а̄лта̄гыл+v1+N:алта̄гыл N_SYNCH "пучок /охапка/" ;
алыщ+N:алыщ N_SYNCS "оружие" ;
а̄мыщ+N:а̄мыщ N_SYNCS "загадка" ;
аптека+N:аптека N_VO_rus100 "аптека" ;
а̄рпи+N:а̄рпи N_VI "запор /для ловли рыбы/" ;
ассоциация+N:ассоциация N_VO_rus100 ;
балка+N:балка N_VO_rus100 "балка /овраг/" ;
бахча+N:бахча N_VO_rus100 "бахча" ;
бойница+N:бойница N_VO_rus100 "бойнйца" ;
броня+N:броня N_VO_rus100 "броня" ;
брюки+N:брюки N_VI_rus100 "брюки" ;
былина+N:былина N_VO_rus100 "былина" ;
ва̄нын+N:ва̄нын N_SYNCH "плечо" ;
ве̄ртпи+N:ве̄ртпи N_VI "терпение" ;
ветчина+N:ветчина N_VO_rus100 ;
вилка+N:вилка N_VO "вилка" ;
во̄щлыл+N:во̄щлыл N_SYNCH "горе" ;
выборы+N:выборы N_VI "выборы" ;
гильдия+N:гильдия N_VO ;
государства+N:государства N_VO_rusmns ;
государство+v2+N:госуда̄рство N_VO_rusmns "государство" ;
гражданства+N:гражданства N_VO_rusmns ;
графика+N:графика N_VO_rus100 ;
детства+N:детства N_VO_rusmns ;
диссертация+N:диссертация N_VO ;
дудка+N:дудка N_VO_rus100 ;
единства+N:единства N_VO_rusmns ;
ё̄паньщи+N:ё̄паньщи N_VI "войлок" ;
законодательства+N:законодательства N_VO_rusmns ;
заявления+N:заявления N_VO ;
золовка+N:золовка N_VO_rus100 ;
имущества+N:имущества N_VO_rusmns ;
искусства+N:искусства N_VO_rusmns ;
кабина+N:кабина N_VO "кабина" ;
какыр+v1+N:какыр N_SYNCH "туловище" ;
кати+N:кати N_VI "кошка" ;
ка̄тхопи+N:ка̄т#хопи N_VI "кисть /руки/" ;
киви+N:киви N_VI_rus100 ;
кӣвыр+N:кӣвыр N_SYNCH "(eng) Relator /(rus) нутро /внутренность/" ;
кисточка+N:кисточка N_VO "кисть /для крашения//рисования/" ;
княжества+N:княжества N_VO_rusmns ;
консе̄рвы+N:консе̄рвы N_VI ;
конфета+N:конфета N_VO "конфета" ;
кувщ+v2+N:кувыщ N_SYNCS "гусь /меховая одёжда/" ;
ла̄плыл+N:ла̄плыл N_SYNCH "обман" ;
ларыщ+N:ларыщ N_SYNCS "хвощ /растение/" ;
ласточка+N:ласточка N_VO "ласточка" ; !!≈ * @CODE@
латышка+N:латышка N_VO_rus100 ;
лесничества+N:лесничества N_VO_rusmns ;
ломари+N:ломари N_VI "морщина" ;
лӯпи+v2+N:лупи N_VI "коряга" ;
лымс-лымыс+N:лымс-лымыс N_SYNCH "мусор /в вихре/" ;
ма̄ньпора+N:ма̄нь#пора N_VO "детство" ;
мастерства+N:мастерства N_VO_rusmns ;
материнства+N:материнства N_VO_rusmns ;
матушка+N:матушка N_VO_rus100 ;
ма̄хум+N:ма̄хум N_SYNCH "люди" ;
метра+v1+N:метра N_VO_rusmns ;
морковка+N:морковка N_VO "морковь" ;
мохлыл+N:мохлыл N_SYNCH "узел" ;
мӯйлапщи+N:мӯйлапщи N_VI "премия" ;
нё̄выль+N:нё̄выль N_SYNCS "мясо" ;
нё̄лыг+N:нё̄лыг N_SYNCH "пиявка" ;
нюлми+N:нюлми N_VI "рана" ;
оборона+N:оборона N_VO "оборона /действия/" ;
общества+N:общества N_VO_rusmns ;
о̄выл+N:о̄выл N_SYNCH "конец" ;
одежда+N:одежда N_VO_rus100 ;
одиночества+N:одиночества N_VO_rusmns ;
отметка+N:отметка N_VO "отметка" ;
па̄лыг-манумтым+N:па̄лыг-манумтым N_SYNCH "разрыв /место/" ;
первенства+N:первенства N_VO_rusmns ;
перевыборы+N:перевыборы N_VI "перевыборы" ;
перепёлка+N:перепёлка N_VO "перепёлка" ;
пе̄сыл+N:пе̄сыл N_SYNCH "траур" ;
плавполиклиника+N:плавполиклиника N_VO_rus100 ;
полщ+v2+N:полыщ N_SYNCS "клевета" ;
по̄льса+N:по̄льса N_VO "польза" ;
похоронка+N:похоронка N_VO_rus100 ;
природа+N:природа N_VO "природа /всё существующее в мире//не созданное человеком/" ;
птицефабрика+N:птицефабрика N_VO_rus100 ;
пӯри+N:пӯри N_VI "свадьба" ;
пӯрыщ+N:пӯрыщ N_SYNCS "свинья" ;
пӯтпӯльна+N:пӯтпӯльна N_VO "погреб" ;
репа+N:репа N_VO "репа" ;
росахыт+N:росахыт N_SYNCH "лохмотья" ;
са̄лы+N:са̄лы N_VI "олень" ;
сампуныт+N:сампуныт N_SYNCH "ресницы" ;
сарыч+N:сарыч N_SYNCS "сарыч" ;
сеялка+N:сеялка N_VO "сеялка" ;
скакалка+N:скакалка N_VO_rus100 ;
содружества+N:содружества N_VO_rusmns ;
солко̄ви+N:солко̄ви N_VI "рубль" ;
сообщества+N:сообщества N_VO_rusmns ;
сорых+N:сорых N_SYNCH "сырок /рыба/" ;
сотрудничества+N:сотрудничества N_VO_rusmns ;
столица+N:столица N_VO "столица" ;
сырыхтулё̄выл+N:сырыхтулё̄выл N_SYNCH "мизинец" ;
таври+v2+N:таври N_VI "прах /пыль/" ;
такси+N:такси N_VI_rus100 "такси" ;
та̄ннё̄выль+N:та̄н#нё̄выль N_SYNCS "мускул" ;
та̄ро̄выл+N:та̄ро̄выл N_SYNCH "корешок" ;
творчества+N:творчества N_VO_rusmns ;
телевышка+N:телевышка N_VO_rus100 ;
теплица+N:теплица N_VO "теплица" ;
толыг+N:толыг N_SYNCH "невод" ;
тушонка+N:тушонка N_VO_rus100 ;
тычинка+N:тычинка N_VO "тычинка" ;
тэ̄рпи+N:тэ̄рпи N_VI "лекарство" ;
ӯлум+v2+N:улум N_SYNCH "сон /состояние/" ;
ӯлыщ+N:ӯлыщ N_SYNCS "скула" ;
флотилия+N:флотилия N_VO "флотилия" ;
ха̄йтыл+N:ха̄йтыл N_SYNCH "бег" ;
ханты+N:ханты N_VI "ханты" ;
хо̄рахщи+N:хо̄рахщи N_VI "бандит" ;
хосыт+N:хосыт N_SYNCH "длина" ;
цифра+v1+N:цифра N_VO_rus100 "цифра" ;
цифра+v2+N:цӣфра N_VO_rusmns "цифра" ;
ща̄гтальпи+N:ща̄гтальпи N_VI "гостинец" ;
ща̄рыщ+v1+N:ща̄рыщ N_SYNCS "море" ;
ще̄мя+N:ще̄мя N_VO "семя" ;
що̄льщи+v2+N:щольщи N_VI ;
э̄лми+v2+N:элми N_VI "лезвие" ;
э̄рыг+N:э̄рыг N_SYNCH "песня" ;
юношества+N:юношества N_VO_rusmns ;
язычества+N:язычества N_VO_rusmns ;
ярмарка+N:ярмарка N_VO_rus100 "ярмарка" ;
ятры+N:ятры N_VI "тетерев" ;
